District of Columbia statutes.
50-2201.22

Appeal from assessment of excise tax for title certificates; election of remedies.

Any person aggrieved by the assessment of any tax imposed by § 50-2201.03(j) may, within 6 months from the date the person entitled to a certificate of title was notified of the amount of such tax, appeal to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia in the same manner and to the same extent as set forth in §§ 47-3303, 47-3304, 47-3306, 47-3307 and 47-3308, and as the same may hereafter be amended.

History

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 129, title III, ch. 146, § 303
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 573, 581, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, §§ 156(a), 161(d)(2)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-705.
1973 Ed., § 40-605-1.